Washington statutes.
RCW 26.44.015

Limitations of chapter.

(1) This chapter shall not be construed to authorize interference with child-raising practices, including reasonable parental discipline, which are not injurious to the child's health, welfare, or safety.

(2) Nothing in this chapter may be used to prohibit the reasonable use of corporal punishment as a means of discipline.

(3) No parent or guardian may be deemed abusive or neglectful solely by reason of the parent's or child's blindness, deafness, developmental disability, or other disability.

[ 2020 c 274 s 8; 2005 c 512 s 4; 1999 c 176 s 28; 1997 c 386 s 23; 1993 c 412 s 11.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Effective date—Short title—2005 c 512: See notes following RCW 26.44.100.

Findings—Purpose—Severability—Conflict with federal requirements—1999 c 176: See notes following RCW 74.34.005.

Application—Effective date—1997 c 386: See notes following RCW 13.50.010.